Indiana, session 2026, HB1131.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-8-2-9.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.189-2017,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) "Esthetician" means a person who engages
solely in one (1) or more of the following practices:
(1) Giving facials, applying makeup, and giving skin care.
(2) Beautifying, massaging, or cleaning the body with the use of
cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams.
(3) Removing superfluous hair from the body by the use of
depilatories, waxing, or tweezers.
(4) Performing any:
(A) eyelash:
(i) lift; or
(ii) tinting;
(B) eyebrow:
(i) lamination; or
(ii) tinting; or
(C) microneedling (as defined in section 14.7 of this
chapter).
(b) The term does not include performing any of the acts described
in subsection (a):
(1) in treating an illness or a disease;
HEA 1131

2
(2) as a student in a beauty culture school that complies with the
notice requirements under IC 25-8-5-6;
(3) without compensation; or
(4) incident to the retail sale of cosmetics.
(c) The term does not include a person who:
(1) engages in threading;
(2) engages in natural hair braiding; and
(3) does not engage in one (1) or more of the practices described
in subsection (a).
SECTION 2. IC 25-8-2-14.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14.7. "Microneedling" means a cosmetic procedure
that uses fine needles to create tiny punctures in the skin at a
penetration depth of at least three-tenths (0.3) of a millimeter but
not greater than two (2) millimeters.
SECTION 3. IC 25-8-10-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.170-2013,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The application described in section 2 of this
chapter must state that the applicant:
(1) holds a cosmetologist license issued under IC 25-8-9 or an
esthetician license issued under IC 25-8-12.5;
(2) (1) has successfully completed the a combined total of six
hundred (600) hours of education and experience requirements
required under the rules adopted by the board in the instruction
of for electrology training in a beauty culture school;
(3) (2) has received a satisfactory grade (as defined by
IC 25-8-4-9) on an examination for electrologist license
prescribed by the board;
(4) (3) has not committed an act for which the applicant could be
disciplined under IC 25-8-14; and
(5) (4) has paid the fee set forth in IC 25-8-13-8 for the issuance
of a license under this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 25-8-10-3.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.170-2013,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3.1. If a person does not receive a satisfactory
grade on the examination described in section 3(3) 3(2) of this chapter,
the person may repeat the examination without completing any
additional study in electrology.
SECTION 5. IC 25-8-12.5-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9. At the agency's request, a person who offers
microneedling shall provide the agency with proof of advanced
HEA 1131

3
training or certification for microneedling.
SECTION 6. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) Not later than June
30, 2027, the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners
shall amend:
(1) 820 IAC 3-1-13 to allow electrology services to be
performed in the same room that is used for esthetics services,
although not at the same time;
(2) 820 IAC 3-2-10 to allow esthetics services to be performed
in the same room that is used for electrology services,
although not at the same time; and
(3) 820 IAC 4-4-7 to require a combined total of six hundred
(600) hours of education and experience for electrology
training.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
HEA 1131

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1131